Maryland, session 2025, HB1274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
SUBTITLE 50. MARYLAND TRANSPARENCY IN THIRD–PARTY LITIGATION
FINANCING ACT.
14–5001.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1274*

HOUSE BILL 1274
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CIVIL ACTION” INCLUDES ANY LEGAL CLAIM, CASE, ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCEEDING, OR PORTFOLIO OF ACTIONS TO RECOVER DAMAGES IN THE STATE.
(C) “CONSUMER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS DOMICILED, RESIDES, OR
IS PRESENT IN THE STATE OR WHO IS OR MAY BECOME A PLAINTIFF, CLAIMANT, OR
COMPLAINANT IN A CIVIL ACTION IN THE STATE.
(D) “LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE” MEANS AN ATTORNEY, A GROUP OF
ATTORNEYS, OR A LAW FIRM LICENSED AND AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE LAW AND
REPRESENT A CONSUMER IN A CIVIL ACTION IN THE STATE.
(E) “LITIGATION FINANCIER” MEANS A PERSON OR GROUP OF PERSONS
ENGAGED IN OR FORMED, CREATED, OR ESTABLISHED FOR THE PURPOSE OF
ENGAGING IN THE BUSINESS OF LITIGATION FINANCING OR ANY OTHER BUSINESS
OR ECONOMIC ACTIVITY IN WHICH A PERSON OR GROUP OF PERSONS RECEIVES
CONSIDERATION OF ANY KIND IN EXCHANGE FOR PROVIDING LITIGATION
FINANCING.
(F) “LITIGATION FINANCING” MEANS THE FINANCING, FUNDING,
ADVANCING, OR LOANING OF MONEY TO A CONSUMER OR A CONSUMER’S LEGAL
REPRESENTATIVE IF:
(1) THE REPAYMENT OF ALL OR ANY PORTION OF THE AMOUNT
FINANCED, FUNDED, ADVANCED, OR LOANED IS:
(I) CONTINGENT ON THE OUTCOME OF A CIVIL ACTION; OR
(II) REQUIRED ONLY IF THE CONSUMER PREVAILS IN A CIVIL
ACTION; OR
(2) THE MONEY OR FUNDS FOR THE REPAYMENT OF ANY AMOUNT OF
FINANCING, FUNDING, ADVANCE, OR LOAN IS DERIVED OR SOURCED, DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY, FROM THE PROCEEDS OR OTHER CONSIDERATION REALIZED FROM
ANY JUDGMENT, AWARD, SETTLEMENT, VERDICT, OR OTHER FORM OF MONETARY
RELIEF THE CONSUMER MAY RECEIVE OR RECOVER IN RELATION TO A CIVIL
ACTION.
(G) (1) “LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT” MEANS A WRITTEN
CONTRACT IN WHICH A LITIGATION FINANCIER AGREES TO PROVIDE LITIGATION

HOUSE BILL 1274 3
FINANCING TO A CONSUMER IN CONJUNCTION WITH A CIVIL ACTION AS
CONSIDERATION FOR:
(I) REPAYMENT OF THE LITIGATION FINANCING;
(II) THE PAYMENT OF INTEREST, FEES, OR OTHER
CONSIDERATION TO THE LITIGATION FINANCIER; OR
(III) ASSIGNING TO THE LITIGATION FINANCIER A RIGHT TO
RECEIVE PAYMENT FROM THE VALUE OF:
1. ANY PROCEEDS OR OTHER CONSIDERATION
REALIZED FROM ANY JUDGMENT, AWARD, SETTLEMENT, OR VERDICT; OR
2. ANY OTHER FORM OF MONETARY RELIEF A
CONSUMER, A LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE, OR ANY OTHER PERSON MAY RECEIVE OR
RECOVER IN RELATION TO THE CIVIL ACTION.
(2) “LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN
AGREEMENT, A CONTRACT, OR AN ENGAGEMENT OF A LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE TO
RENDER LEGAL SERVICES TO A CONSUMER ON A CONTINGENCY FEE BASIS,
INCLUDING THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEGAL COSTS BY THE LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE
IN WHICH THE SERVICES OR COSTS ARE PROVIDED TO OR ON BEHALF OF A
CONSUMER BY THE LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE WHO IS REPRESENTING THE
CONSUMER IN A CIVIL ACTION.
(H) “PORTFOLIO OF ACTIONS” MEANS AN ARRANGEMENT IN WHICH
LITIGATION FINANCIERS FINANCE MULTIPLE CIVIL ACTIONS BELONGING TO AN
ATTORNEY OR A LAW FIRM WITH ANY RETURN ON INVESTED CAPITAL COMING FROM
THE SETTLEMENT OR JUDGMENT OF ANY INDIVIDUAL CIVIL ACTION OR GROUP OF
CIVIL ACTIONS.
14–5002.
IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO PROMOTE CONSUMER
PROTECTION AND TRANSPARENCY IN THIRD–PARTY LITIGATION FINANCING
TRANSACTIONS THROUGH THE REGULATION AND DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS
PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
14–5003.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO:

HOUSE BILL 1274
(1) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES LITIGATION
FINANCING, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION OR ONE OR MORE OF ITS MEMBERS WITHOUT RECEIVING AS
CONSIDERATION FOR THE LITIGATION FINANCING:
(I) THE PAYMENT OF INTEREST, FEES, OR OTHER
CONSIDERATION; OR
(II) EXCEPT FOR IN–HOUSE COUNSEL OF THE NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION, ANY RIGHT TO RECOVERY OR PAYMENT FROM THE AMOUNT OF ANY
JUDGMENT, AWARD, SETTLEMENT, VERDICT, OR OTHER FORM OF MONETARY
RELIEF OBTAINED IN THE CIVIL ACTION;
(2) LITIGATION FINANCING PROVIDED BY A PERSON ENGAGED IN
COMMERCE OR BUSINESS ACTIVITY, BUT ONLY IF THE PERSON DOES NOT:
(I) CHARGE OR COLLECT ANY INTEREST, FEES, OR OTHER
CONSIDERATION;
(II) RETAIN OR RECEIVE ANY FINANCIAL INTEREST IN THE
OUTCOME OF A CIVIL ACTION; OR
(III) RECEIVE ANY RIGHT TO RECOVERY OR PAYMENT FROM THE
AMOUNT OF ANY JUDGMENT, AWARD, SETTLEMENT, VERDICT, OR OTHER FORM OF
MONETARY RELIEF OBTAINED IN A CIVIL ACTION; OR
(3) A BANKING INSTITUTION, AS DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THE
FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE, THAT DOES NOT RECEIVE AS CONSIDERATION
FOR LOANING MONEY TO A BORROWER A RIGHT TO RECEIVE PAYMENT FROM THE
VALUE OF ANY PROCEEDS OR OTHER CONSIDERATION REALIZED FROM ANY
JUDGMENT, AWARD, SETTLEMENT, VERDICT, OR OTHER FORM OF MONETARY
RELIEF THE BORROWER MAY RECEIVE OR RECOVER IN RELATION TO A CIVIL
ACTION.
14–5004.
(A) BEFORE A LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT MAY BE SIGNED BY A
PARTY TO THE CONTRACT, THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE LITIGATION
FINANCING CONTRACT SHALL BE RECORDED IN WRITING AND INCLUDE EACH TERM
AND CONDITION INTENDED BY THE PARTIES WITHOUT OMISSION OF ANY INTENDED
TERM OR CONDITION.

HOUSE BILL 1274 5
(B) A LITIGATION FINANCIER MAY NOT AMEND THE TERMS OR CONDITIONS
OF AN EXECUTED LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT WITHOUT FULL DISCLOSURE
TO, AND PRIOR WRITTEN CONSENT OF, EACH PARTY TO THE LITIGATION FINANCING
CONTRACT.
14–5005.
(A) (1) A LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT SHALL CONTAIN THE
DISCLOSURES AND STATEMENTS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE DISCLOSURES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
CONSTITUTE THE MATERIAL TERMS OF A LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT.
(B) UNLESS OTHERWISE SPECIFIED, THE DISCLOSURES AND STATEMENTS
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE TYPED IN AT LEAST 14 POINT, BOLD
FONT AND BE PLACED CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY WITHIN THE LITIGATION
FINANCING CONTRACT.
(C) A LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT SHALL DISCLOSE:
(1) ON THE FIRST PAGE OF THE LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT,
THE NAME, STREET ADDRESS, AND MAILING ADDRESS OF THE LITIGATION
FINANCIER;
(2) THAT SOME OR ALL OF THE LITIGATION FINANCING MAY BE
TAXABLE;
(3) A DESCRIPTION OF THE CONSUMER’S RIGHT OF RECISSION;
(4) AN ITEMIZATION OF CHARGES;
(5) THE TOTAL FUNDED AMOUNT PROVIDED TO THE CONSUMER
UNDER THE LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT;
(6) THE TOTAL AMOUNT DUE FROM THE CONSUMER, IN 6–MONTH
INTERVALS OVER A PERIOD OF 42 MONTHS, INCLUDING ALL CHARGES AND FEES;
(7) IF THE CONSUMER SEEKS OR HAS SOUGHT MORE THAN ONE
LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT, THE CUMULATIVE AMOUNT DUE FROM THE
CONSUMER FOR EACH TRANSACTION AND CHARGE UNDER ALL LITIGATION
FINANCING CONTRACTS, IF REPAYMENT IS MADE ANY TIME AFTER THE CONTRACTS
ARE EXECUTED;

HOUSE BILL 1274
(8) THAT THERE ARE NO CHARGES OR FEES TO BE PAID BY THE
CONSUMER OTHER THAN WHAT IS DISCLOSED IN THE LITIGATION FINANCING
CONTRACT;
(9) THAT IF THERE IS NO RECOVERY OF ANY MONEY FROM THE
CONSUMER’S CIVIL ACTION, THE CONSUMER SHALL OWE NOTHING TO THE
LITIGATION FINANCIER; AND
(10) THAT IF THERE IS NOT ENOUGH RECOVERY TO SATISFY THE
TOTAL AMOUNT ASSIGNED TO THE LITIGATION FINANCIER, THE CONSUMER SHALL
OWE NOTHING IN EXCESS OF THE CONSUMER’S RECOVERY AMOUNT.
(D) A LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) TERMS EXPLAINED BY THE FOLLOWING TEXT:
“CONSUMER’S RIGHT TO CANCELLATION: YOU MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT
WITHOUT PENALTY OR FURTHER OBLIGATION WITHIN FIVE (5) BUSINESS DAYS
FROM THE DATE YOU SIGNED THIS CONTRACT OR RECEIVED FINANCING FROM
(INSERT NAME OF THE LITIGATION FINANCIER) BY RETURNING THE FUNDS TO
(INSERT NAME, OFFICE ADDRESS, AND OFFICE HOURS OF THE LITIGATION
FINANCIER) OR BY U.S. MAIL (INSERT NAME AND MAILING ADDRESS OF LITIGATION
FINANCIER). FOR PURPOSES OF THE RETURN DEADLINE BY U.S. MAIL, THE
POSTMARK DATE ON THE RETURNED FUNDS OR, IF MAILED BY REGISTERED OR
CERTIFIED MAIL, THE DATE OF THE RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED SHALL BE
CONSIDERED THE DATE OF RETURN.
THE LITIGATION FINANCIER AGREES THAT IT HAS NO RIGHT TO AND WILL NOT
MAKE ANY DECISIONS ABOUT THE CONDUCT OF YOUR LAWSUIT OR DISPUTE AND
THAT THE RIGHT TO MAKE THOSE DECISIONS REMAINS SOLELY WITH YOU AND YOUR
ATTORNEY.
THE LITIGATION FINANCIER AGREES THAT IT HAS NO RIGHT TO, AND WILL
NOT DEMAND, REQUEST, RECEIVE, OR EXERCISE ANY RIGHT TO, INFLUENCE,
AFFECT, OR OTHERWISE MAKE ANY DECISION IN THE HANDLING, CONDUCT,
ADMINISTRATION, LITIGATION, SETTLEMENT, OR RESOLUTION OF YOUR CIVIL
ACTION, CLAIM, CASE, CAUSE OF ACTION, OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDING. ALL
OF THESE RIGHTS REMAIN SOLELY WITH YOU AND YOUR LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE.
IF THERE IS NO RECOVERY OF ANY MONEY FROM YOUR CIVIL ACTION, CLAIM,
CASE, CAUSE OF ACTION, OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDING OR IF THERE IS NOT
ENOUGH MONEY TO SATISFY IN FULL THE PORTION ASSIGNED TO THE LITIGATION
FINANCIER, YOU WILL NOT OWE ANYTHING IN EXCESS OF YOUR RECOVERY.

HOUSE BILL 1274 7
IF THE CONSUMER IS REPRESENTED BY A LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE IN THE
CIVIL ACTION THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT,
THE LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE SHALL ACKNOWLEDGE IN THE CONTRACT THAT THE
LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE AND THE LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE’S EMPLOYER AND
EMPLOYEES HAVE NOT RECEIVED OR PAID A REFERRAL FEE OR ANY OTHER
CONSIDERATION FROM OR TO THE LITIGATION FINANCIER, AND HAVE NO
OBLIGATION TO DO SO IN THE FUTURE.
IF THE CONSUMER’S LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE IS A PARTY TO A LITIGATION
FINANCING CONTRACT RELATED TO THE CONSUMER’S CIVIL ACTION THAT IS THE
SUBJECT OF THE LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT, THE LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE
SHALL DISCLOSE AND DELIVER THE LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT TO THE
CONSUMER. FOLLOWING THIS DISCLOSURE AND DELIVERY, THE CONSUMER SHALL
SIGN AN ACKNOWLEDGMENT THAT THE CONSUMER HAS READ AND UNDERSTANDS
THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT AND THE
CONSUMER MUST BE PROVIDED A COPY OF THE ACKNOWLEDGMENT.”;
(2) TERMS EXPLAINED USING THE FOLLOWING TEXT IN 14 POINT,
BOLD FONT AND IN ALL CAPITAL LETTERS CONTAINED WITHIN A BOX:
“THE FUNDED AMOUNT AND AGREED–UPON CHARGES SHALL BE PAID ONLY
FROM THE PROCEEDS OF YOUR CIVIL ACTION AND SHALL BE PAID ONLY TO THE
EXTENT THAT THERE ARE AVAILABLE PROCEEDS FROM YOUR CIVIL ACTION. YOU
WILL NOT OWE (INSERT NAME OF THE LITIGATION FINANCIER) ANYTHING IF THERE
ARE NO PROCEEDS FROM YOUR CIVIL ACTION, UNLESS YOU HAVE VIOLATED ANY
MATERIAL TERM OF THIS CONTRACT OR YOU HAVE COMMITTED FRAUD AGAINST
THE LITIGATION FINANCIER.”; AND
(3) IMMEDIATELY ABOVE THE PLACE ON THE LITIGATION FINANCING
CONTRACT WHERE THE CONSUMER’S SIGNATURE IS REQUIRED, TERMS EXPLAINED
USING THE FOLLOWING TEXT IN 14 POINT, BOLD FONT AND IN ALL CAPITAL
LETTERS:
“DO NOT SIGN THIS CONTRACT BEFORE YOU READ IT COMPLETELY. IF THIS
CONTRACT CONTAINS ANY INCOMPLETE SECTIONS, YOU ARE ENTITLED TO A
COMPLETELY FILLED–IN COPY OF THE CONTRACT PRIOR TO SIGNING IT. BEFORE
YOU SIGN THIS CONTRACT, YOU SHOULD OBTAIN THE ADVICE OF AN ATTORNEY.
DEPENDING ON THE CIRCUMSTANCES YOU MAY WANT TO CONSULT A TAX ADVISOR,
A FINANCIAL PROFESSIONAL, OR AN ACCOUNTANT.”.
14–5006.

HOUSE BILL 1274
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE STIPULATED OR ORDERED BY A COURT, A
PARTY IN A CIVIL ACTION SHALL, WITHOUT WAITING FOR A DISCOVERY REQUEST,
PROVIDE TO EACH OF THE OTHER PARTIES IN THE CIVIL ACTION AND EACH INSURER
THAT HAS A DUTY TO DEFEND ANOTHER PARTY IN THE CIVIL ACTION ANY
LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT UNDER WHICH A LITIGATION FINANCIER HAS A
RIGHT TO RECEIVE COMPENSATION THAT IS CONTINGENT IN ANY RESPECT ON THE
OUTCOME OF THE CIVIL ACTION.
(2) DISCLOSURE IS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION REGARDLESS OF WHETHER A CIVIL ACTION HAS FORMALLY
COMMENCED.
(3) (I) THE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION IS A CONTINUING OBLIGATION.
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER ENTERING INTO A LITIGATION
FINANCING CONTRACT OR AMENDING AN EXISTING LITIGATION FINANCING
CONTRACT, A PARTY IN A CIVIL ACTION SHALL DISCLOSE AND DELIVER A NEW OR
AMENDED LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT TO ALL OTHER PARTIES AND EACH
INSURER THAT HAS A DUTY TO DEFEND ANOTHER PARTY IN THE CIVIL ACTION.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
ADMISSIBILITY OF A LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT IN A CIVIL ACTION SHALL
BE GOVERNED BY THE MARYLAND RULES OF EVIDENCE.
(2) A LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT MAY NOT BE ADMISSIBLE IN
A CIVIL ACTION SOLELY ON THE BASIS OF THE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
(C) THE EXISTENCE OF A LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT AND EACH
PARTICIPANT OR PARTY TO A LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT IS A PERMISSIBLE
SUBJECT OF DISCOVERY IN ANY CIVIL ACTION FOR WHICH LITIGATION FINANCING
IS PROVIDED UNDER THE LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER A CIVIL ACTION HAS FORMALLY COMMENCED.
14–5007.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES TO ANY CIVIL ACTION FILED OR CERTIFIED AS
A CLASS ACTION IN WHICH A LITIGATION FINANCIER PROVIDES LITIGATION
FINANCING TO A CONSUMER INVOLVED IN THE CIVIL ACTION.
(B) A LITIGATION FINANCIER SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1274 9
(1) OWE A FIDUCIARY DUTY TO EACH CLASS MEMBER AND INTENDED
BENEFICIARY OF A PUTATIVE OR CERTIFIED CLASS; AND
(2) ACT IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH THE LITIGATION
FINANCIER’S FIDUCIARY DUTY THROUGHOUT THE CIVIL ACTION.
(C) (1) IN ADDITION TO THE DISCLOSURES REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE, A LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF A PUTATIVE OR CERTIFIED CLASS SHALL
DISCLOSE TO EACH PARTY, PUTATIVE OR CERTIFIED CLASS MEMBER, AND THE
COURT ANY LEGAL, FINANCIAL, OR OTHER RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN THE LEGAL
REPRESENTATIVE AND THE LITIGATION FINANCIER.
(2) THE LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF THE PUTATIVE OR CERTIFIED
CLASS SHALL DISCLOSE TO EACH PUTATIVE OR CERTIFIED CLASS MEMBER A TRUE
AND CORRECT COPY OF ANY LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT ON REQUEST.
14–5008.
(A) A LITIGATION FINANCIER MAY NOT:
(1) PAY, OFFER, OR ACCEPT A COMMISSION, REFERRAL FEE, REBATE,
OR OTHER FORM OF CONSIDERATION TO OR FROM ANY PERSON IN EXCHANGE FOR
REFERRING A CONSUMER TO A LITIGATION FINANCIER;
(2) CHARGE A RATE OF INTEREST THAT EXCEEDS THE RATE OF
INTEREST ALLOWED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) ADVERTISE FALSE OR MISLEADING INFORMATION REGARDING
THE LITIGATION FINANCIER’S PRODUCTS OR SERVICES;
(4) REFER OR REQUIRE A CONSUMER TO HIRE OR ENGAGE ANY
PERSON PROVIDING ANY GOODS OR RENDERING ANY SERVICES TO THE CONSUMER;
(5) FAIL TO PROMPTLY DELIVER A FULLY COMPLETED AND SIGNED
LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT TO A CONSUMER OR THE CONSUMER’S LEGAL
REPRESENTATIVE;
(6) ATTEMPT TO SECURE A REMEDY OR OBTAIN A WAIVER OF A
REMEDY, INCLUDING COMPENSATORY, STATUTORY, OR PUNITIVE DAMAGES, THAT A
CONSUMER MAY BE ENTITLED TO PURSUE OR OTHERWISE RECOVER;
(7) OFFER OR PROVIDE LEGAL ADVICE TO THE CONSUMER;

HOUSE BILL 1274
(8) ASSIGN, INCLUDING SECURITIZING, A LITIGATION FINANCING
CONTRACT IN WHOLE OR IN PART;
(9) REPORT A CONSUMER TO A CONSUMER CREDIT REPORTING
AGENCY IF INSUFFICIENT FUNDS REMAIN TO REPAY THE LITIGATION FINANCIER IN
FULL FROM THE PROCEEDS RECEIVED FROM ANY JUDGMENT, AWARD,
SETTLEMENT, VERDICT, OR OTHER FORM OF MONETARY RELIEF OBTAINED IN A
CIVIL ACTION THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT;
(10) DEMAND, REQUEST, RECEIVE, OR EXERCISE A RIGHT OF THE
CONSUMER OR THE CONSUMER’S LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE TO INFLUENCE, AFFECT,
OR OTHERWISE MAKE A DECISION IN THE HANDLING, CONDUCT, ADMINISTRATION,
LITIGATION, SETTLEMENT, OR RESOLUTION OF A CIVIL ACTION FOR WHICH THE
LITIGATION FINANCIER HAS PROVIDED LITIGATION FINANCING; OR
(11) KNOWINGLY ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT CREATING A RIGHT FOR
ANYONE OTHER THAN THE NAMED PARTIES, COUNSEL OF RECORD, OR LAW FIRM OF
RECORD TO MAKE OR RECEIVE ANY PAYMENT THAT IS CONTINGENT ON THE
OUTCOME OF A CIVIL ACTION.
(B) A PERSON WHO PROVIDES GOODS OR RENDERS A SERVICE TO A
CONSUMER MAY NOT:
(1) HAVE A FINANCIAL INTEREST IN THE CONSUMER’S LITIGATION
FINANCING CONTRACT; OR
(2) RECEIVE A COMMISSION, REFERRAL FEE, REBATE, OR OTHER
FORM OF CONSIDERATION FROM A LITIGATION FINANCIER OR AN AGENT OR
AFFILIATE OF THE LITIGATION FINANCIER.
14–5009.
(A) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ENFORCE THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE BY A LITIGATION FINANCIER SHALL
RENDER A LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE BY THE
LITIGATION FINANCIER AND ANY SUCCESSOR–IN–INTEREST TO THE LITIGATION
FINANCING CONTRACT.
(C) IF A LITIGATION FINANCIER CHARGES A RATE OF INTEREST THAT
EXCEEDS THE RATE OF INTEREST ALLOWED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS

HOUSE BILL 1274 11
ARTICLE, THE LITIGATION FINANCIER IS SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND
PENALTY PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS ARTICLE.
14–5010.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CITED AS THE MARYLAND TRANSPARENCY IN
THIRD–PARTY LITIGATION FINANCING ACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any litigation financing contract, as defined in § 14–5001 of the Commercial
Law Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, entered into before the effective date of this
Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.